Montana, session 2025, SB492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-2-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-2-106. Disclosure. (1) (a) Prior to December 15 of each even-numbered year, each state officer,
holdover senator, supreme court justice, and district court judge shall file with the commissioner of political
practices a business disclosure statement on a form provided by the commissioner. An individual filing pursuant
to subsection (1)(b) or (1)(c) is not required to file under this subsection (1)(a) during the same period.
(b) Each candidate for a statewide or a state office elected from a district shall, within 5 5 days of
the time that the candidate files for office, file a business disclosure statement with the commissioner of political
practices on a form provided by the commissioner.
(c) An individual appointed to office who would be required to file under subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b)
is required to file the business disclosure statement at the earlier of the time of submission of the person's
name for confirmation or the assumption of the office.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4), the statement must provide the following information:
(a) the name, address, and type of business of the individual;
(b) each present or past employing entity from which benefits, including retirement benefits, are
currently received by the individual;
(c) each business, firm, corporation, partnership, and other business or professional entity or trust
in which the individual holds an more than a 10% interest, or if the company is publicly traded, more than a 1%
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 492
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 492
interest;
(d) each entity not listed under subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c) in which the individual is an officer
or director, regardless of whether or not the entity is organized for profit; and
(e) all real property, other than a personal residence, in which the individual holds an more than a
10% interest. Real property may be described by general description.
(3) Disclosure of mutual funds under subsection (2) is not required.
(4) An individual may not assume or continue to exercise the powers and duties of the office to
which that individual has been elected or appointed until the statement has been filed as provided in subsection
(1).
(4)(5) An individual required to file a business disclosure statement may certify that the information
required by subsection (2) has not changed from the most recent statement filed by the individual. The
commissioner shall provide a certification form.
(5)(6) The commissioner of political practices shall make the business disclosure statements and
certification forms available to any individual upon request."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 492
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 492, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 492
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING THE BUSINESS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR
STATEWIDE OR STATE DISTRICT ELECTED OFFICIALS, CANDIDATES FOR STATEWIDE OR STATE
DISTRICT OFFICES, DEPARTMENT DIRECTORS, AND INDIVIDUALS APPOINTED TO FILL THOSE
POSITIONS; AND AMENDING SECTION 2-2-106, MCA.”